Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-3307
Remedies not exclusive.

The remedies provided in the Offstreet Parking District Act for the enforcement of taxes or assessments levied or bonds issued pursuant to the act are not exclusive.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 7, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-818;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 7, p. 440;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 185.